Hawaii statutes.
[§634-3] Actions against persons by firm
name. Whenever two or more persons, associated in any business, transact
such business under a firm name, whether it comprises the names of such persons
or not, the associates may be sued by such firm name, the summons in such case
being served on one or more of the associates or as otherwise provided by rule
of court; and any judgment recovered against the firm, as such, may be enforced
against the firm property, and against the individual property of any of the associates
who have been served with process or who have appeared in the action. [L 1915,
c 210, §1; RL 1925, §2364; RL 1935, §4048; RL 1945, §10040; RL 1955, §230-10;
HRS §634-34; am L 1972, c 89, §2A(c); ren HRS §634-3]

Cross References

Organizations and associations, see §634-30.

Rules of Court

See HRCP rule 23.2.

Service, see HRCP rule 4.

Case Notes

Cited: 33 H. 180, 191 (1934).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next